Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB149.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 365 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Prohibited advertisement" means any written or electronic communication
by a contractor that encourages, instructs, or induces a residential property
owner to contact any insurance company personnel for the purpose of
making an insurance claim for roof damage. This includes but is not limited
to a door hanger, business card, magnet, flyer, pamphlet, and email; and
(b) "Solicit" means to contact a residential property owner in person or
through electronic means, including but not limited to email or telephone.
(2) A person shall not:
(a) Solicit a residential property owner by means of a prohibited advertisement;
(b) Offer a residential property owner a rebate, gift card, cash, coupon, waiver
of any insurance deductible, or any other thing of value in exchange for:
1. Allowing the person or his or her agent to conduct an inspection of the
residential property owner's roof; or
2. Making an insurance claim for damage to the residential property
owner's roof in a way that purports to interpret an insurance policy;
(c) Offer, deliver, receive, or accept any compensation, inducement, or reward
for the referral of any work to a business or person that performs repair
work services on residential property for which insurance proceeds are
payable; or
(d) Provide an insured with an agreement authorizing roof repairs without
providing a good-faith estimate of the itemized and detailed cost of services
and materials for repairs undertaken pursuant to a property insurance
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 9/9/2025 4:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 335
claim. If the actual cost of repairs differs from the initial estimate as a result
of an insurance claim adjustment, it shall not be a violation of this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 9/9/2025 4:21 PM Jacketed